Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 4

Setoff

20-6-401. Setoff by co-maker or surety.

A co-maker or surety, when sued alone, may, with the consent of the co-maker's or surety's co-maker or principal, use, by way of setoff, any of the debts or demands, held by the co-maker or principal against the plaintiff at the commencement of the action, and matured when offered in setoff, but the plaintiff may meet it in the same way as if made by the co-maker or principal who originally held the debts or demands.

Code 1858, § 2920; Shan., § 4641; mod. Code 1932, § 8770; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1003; modified.

Cross-References. Counterclaim and cross-claim, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, §§ 2, 7.

Law Reviews.

Permissible Joinder, Counter Declarations and Crossbills: The Tennessee Procedure (Larry S. Banks), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 401.

20-6-402. Costs on equal demands.

On a plea of setoff or recoupment, if the demand of defendant equals the demand of the plaintiff, judgment for all costs is to be rendered for defendant.

Code 1932, § 8771; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1005.

Cross-References. Costs, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 54.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, §§ 2, 11.

Collateral References. 20 Am. Jur. 2d Costs §§ 16, 20, 61.

20 C.J.S. Costs § 12; 49 C.J.S. Judgments § 568.

Costs
270.

20-6-403. Judgment molded to facts.

When there are several defendants, the verdicts and judgments, whether the pleadings by them are joint or several, shall be molded according to the facts and to meet the exigencies of the case.

Code 1858, § 2923 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 71, § 1); Shan., § 4644; Code 1932, § 8773; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1006.

Cross-References. Judgment according to rights of parties, §25-1-105.

Judgments, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 54.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 21; 22 Tenn. Juris., Setoff, Recoupment and Counterclaim, § 13.